Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 2. Independent Candidates.

§ 24.2-505.
Declaration of candidacy required of independent candidates.

Any person, other than a candidate for a party nomination or a party nominee, who intends to be a candidate for any office to be elected by the qualified voters of the Commonwealth at large or of a congressional district shall file a declaration of candidacy with the State Board, on a form prescribed by the Board, designating the office for which he is a candidate. The written declaration shall be attested by two witnesses who are qualified voters of the Commonwealth or of the congressional district, or acknowledged before some officer authorized to take acknowledgements to deeds. The declaration shall be signed by the candidate, but if he is incapable of writing his proper signature then some mark adopted by him as his signature shall be acknowledged before some officer authorized to take acknowledgments to deeds.The State Board shall notify the respective secretaries of the appropriate electoral boards of the qualified candidates who have so filed.

Any person, other than a candidate for a party nomination or party nominee, who intends to be a candidate for election to the General Assembly shall file a declaration of candidacy with the general registrar of the county or city where he resides. The declaration shall be in all respects the same as that required to be given to the State Board by statewide and congressional district candidates. The general registrar shall, within three days after receiving the declaration, (i) deliver it in person or transmit it by certified mail, along with the petitions required by §

24.2-506

or copies thereof, to the general registrars of the other counties or cities, if any, in the legislative district for delivery to the secretaries of the electoral boards and (ii) deliver the declaration and such petitions to the secretary of his electoral board. He shall transmit the names of the candidates who have filed with him to the State Board immediately after the filing deadline.

Any person, other than a candidate for a party nomination or party nominee, who intends to be a candidate at any election for any other office shall file a declaration of candidacy with the general registrar of the county or city where he resides. The declaration shall be in all respects the same as that required to be given to the State Board by statewide and congressional district candidates. The general registrar shall, within three days after receiving the declaration, deliver it in person or transmit it by certified mail, along with the petitions required by §

24.2-506

or copies thereof, to the secretaries of the electoral boards of the counties or cities whose electors vote for the office. He shall transmit the names of the candidates who have filed with him to the State Board immediately after the filing deadline.

If requested in writing by a candidate filing pursuant to subsection B or C, the secretary of the electoral board shall notify him of any irregularity in the declaration or petitions which can be corrected prior to the filing deadline.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-130, 24-131, 24-134.1, 24-135; 1958, c. 605; 1960, c. 427; 1962, c. 536; 1964, cc. 540, 541; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-166; 1971, Ex. Sess., cc. 119, 247; 1972, c. 620; 1973, c. 30; 1974, c. 428; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 616; 1978, c. 778; 1981, c. 425; 1983, c. 461; 1984, c. 480; 1991, c. 137; 1993, c. 641; 1996, c. 270.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, § 45.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Validity of petition. —

An independent candidate for a congressional political office did not collect the required number of valid signatures and, therefore, could not be included on the ballot for the congressional district because the petition of the candidate contained forgery, perjury, fraud, and significant material, sophomoric errors of such a nature, and so substantial, as to leave the circuit court with no doubt that there were less than 1,000 valid signatures on the candidacy petitions. Democratic Party of Va. v. Piper, 102 Va. Cir. 478, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 1556 (Richmond Sept. 6, 2018).

§ 24.2-506.
Petition of qualified voters required; number of signatures required; certain towns excepted.

The name of any candidate for any office, other than a party nominee, shall not be printed upon any official ballots provided for the election unless he shall file along with his declaration of candidacy a petition therefor, on a form prescribed by the State Board, signed by the number of qualified voters specified in this subsection after January 1 of the year in which the election is held and listing the residence address of each such voter. Each signature on the petition shall have been witnessed by a person who is not a minor or a felon whose voting rights have not been restored and whose affidavit to that effect appears on each page of the petition. Each such person circulating a petition who is not a legal resident of the Commonwealth shall sign a statement on the affidavit that he consents to the jurisdiction of the courts of Virginia in resolving any disputes concerning the circulation of petitions, or signatures contained therein, by that person. The signatures of qualified voters collected by a nonresident petition circulator who fails to sign such statement, or who later fails to appear or produce documents when properly served with a subpoena to do so, shall not be counted towards the minimum number of signatures required pursuant to this subsection.Each voter signing the petition may provide on the petition the last four digits of his social security number, if any; however, noncompliance with this requirement shall not be cause to invalidate the voter’s signature on the petition.The minimum number of signatures of qualified voters required for candidate petitions shall be as follows:

For a candidate for the United States Senate, Governor, Lieutenant Governor, or Attorney General, 10,000 signatures, including the signatures of at least 400 qualified voters from each congressional district in the Commonwealth;

For a candidate for the United States House of Representatives, 1,000 signatures;

For a candidate for the Senate of Virginia, 250 signatures;

For a candidate for the House of Delegates or for a constitutional office, 125 signatures;

For a candidate for membership on the governing body or elected school board of any county or city, 125 signatures; or if from an election district not at large containing 1,000 or fewer registered voters, 50 signatures;

For a candidate for membership on the governing body or elected school board of any town that has more than 3,500 registered voters, 125 signatures; or if from a ward or other district not at large, 25 signatures;

For a candidate for membership on the governing body or elected school board of any town that has at least 1,500 but not more than 3,500 registered voters, 50 signatures; or if from a ward or other district not at large, 25 signatures;

For a candidate for membership on the governing body or elected school board of any town that has fewer than 1,500 registered voters, no petition shall be required;

For a candidate for director of a soil and water conservation district created pursuant to Article 3 (§ 10.1-506 et seq.) of Chapter 5 of Title 10.1, 25 signatures; and

For any other candidate, 50 signatures.

The State Board shall approve uniform standards by which petitions filed by a candidate for office, other than a party nominee, are reviewed to determine if the petitions contain sufficient signatures of qualified voters as required in subsection A.The State Board of Elections, on or before January 1, 2020, shall revise its processes and associated regulations for reviewing and processing candidate petitions. Such revisions shall provide a process for checking petition signatures that includes a method for determining if a petition signature belongs to an individual whose prior registration has been canceled and the reason for such cancellation. The process shall provide for the tracking of such information associated with each petition. The process shall provide for the escalation of cases of suspected fraud to the electoral board, the State Board, or the office of the attorney for the Commonwealth, as appropriate.

If a candidate, other than a party nominee, does not qualify to have his name appear on the ballot by reason of the candidate’s filed petition not containing the minimum number of signatures of qualified voters for the office sought, the candidate may appeal that determination within five calendar days of the issuance of the notice of disqualification pursuant to §

24.2-612

or notice from the State Board that the candidate did not meet the requirements to have his name appear on the ballot.Appeals made by candidates for a county, city, or town office shall be filed with the electoral board. Appeals made by candidates for all other offices shall be filed with the State Board. The appeal shall be heard by the State Board or the electoral board, as appropriate, within five business days of its filing. The electoral board shall notify the State Board of any appeal that is filed with the electoral board.The State Board shall develop procedures for the conduct of such an appeal. The consideration on appeal shall be limited to whether or not the signatures on the petitions that were filed were reasonably rejected according to the requirements of this title and the uniform standards approved by the State Board for the review of petitions. Immediately after the conclusion of the appeal hearing, the entity conducting the appeal shall notify the candidate and, if applicable, the State Board, of its decision in writing. The decision on appeal shall be final and not subject to further appeal.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-133; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-168; 1971, Ex. Sess., cc. 119, 247; 1978, c. 778; 1980, c. 639; 1982, c. 650; 1983, c. 188; 1987, c. 118; 1989, c. 141; 1992, c. 855; 1993, cc. 407, 641; 1998, cc. 152, 246; 2000, cc. 232, 252; 2001, c. 53; 2003, c. 477; 2010, c. 215; 2012, cc. 166, 538; 2013, c. 684; 2017, c. 355; 2019, c. 682; 2020, c. 501.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 407 amended former § 24.1-168, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 1993, c. 641, cl. 6, effect has been given in this section, as set out above. In accordance with c. 407, the amendment inserted “or a contiguous” in the second sentence of the first paragraph.

Acts 2019, c. 682 was codified as the second paragraph of subsection B of §

24.2-506

at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, Item 86 K, as added by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides:

“K.1 Notwithstanding Virginia Code §§

24.2-506

,

24.2-521

, and

24.2-684.1

, during a state of emergency as declared by the Governor due to the novel coronavirus (COVID-19) during 2021, any candidate for nomination by primary or any candidate for any office, other than a party nominee, may gather petition signatures as prescribed under Chapter 6 of Title 24.2 or by using the relevant form published by the Department of Elections as described under paragraph (2).

“2. For local offices, offices of the General Assembly, statewide offices, constitutional offices, and referenda, the Department of Elections will develop and publish, not later than March 1, 2021, forms to be used for petition circulation that permit a qualified petition signer to sign a petition while not in the presence of a petition circulator, provided that, in using the form, the petition signer must provide the following information:

“a. Affirmation that the signer is who they attest they are;

“b. Affirmation that the signer is a resident of their jurisdiction, including a statement of their address; and

“c. The last four digits of the signer’s social security number.

“3. If an individual signs a petition form published by the Department of Elections as described under paragraph (2), that individual shall transmit that form, either by mail, ITEM 86. electronically, or physically, to the candidate, the candidate’s campaign, or the petition circulator.

“4. If a petition form is required to be submitted to the Chair or Chair of the several committees of the respective party of the candidate for whom the petition is signed, the candidate, the candidate’s campaign, or the appropriate petition circulator shall submit the petition forms as prescribed under Title 24.2 of the Virginia Code.

“5. If a petition form is required to be submitted to a general registrar, the candidate, the candidate’s campaign, or the appropriate petition circulator shall submit the petition forms as prescribed under Title 24.2 of the Virginia Code.

“6. If a petition form is required to be submitted to the State Board of Elections, the candidate, the candidate’s campaign, or the appropriate petition circulator shall submit the petition form to the State Board of Elections either by mail, electronically, or physically. Any such petition forms shall be required to be received by the State Board of Elections by the relevant deadline under Virginia Code Title 24.2.

“7. If a petition is required to be submitted to a court or other appropriate authority pursuant o Virginia Code §

24.2-684.1

, the individual circulating such petition shall submit the petition to the court or other appropriate authority as prescribed under Title 24.2 of the Virginia Code.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 232 and 252 are identical, and inserted “or qualified to register to vote” in the second sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 53 substituted “fifty” for “50” in subdivisions 5 and 9, substituted “twenty-five” for “25” in subdivision 6, added subdivision 8, redesignated former subdivision 8 as 9, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 477 substituted “25” for “twenty-five” and “50” for “fifty” throughout the section; and deleted “and, in the case of a statewide office, is a resident of the same or a contiguous congressional district as the voter whose signature is witnessed” preceding “and whose” in the last sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 215 substituted “may provide on the petition the last four digits of” for “shall provide on the petition” in the second paragraph.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by c. 166, effective March 7, 2012, and c. 538, effective April 4, 2012, are identical, and
substituted “who is himself a legal resident of the Commonwealth and who is not a minor or a felon whose voting rights have not been restored” for “who is himself a qualified voter, or qualified to register to vote, for the office for which he is circulating the petition” in the second sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 684 inserted the subsection A designation; and added subsections B and C.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 355, in subsection A, substituted “in this subsection” for “below” in the first paragraph; in subdivision A 6, substituted “3,500 registered voters” for “1,500 registered voters”; added subdivision A 7 and renumbered the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and in subdivision A 8, inserted “a candidate for” and substituted “that has fewer than 1,500 registered voters” for “which has 1,500 or fewer registered voters”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 501, in subsection A, deleted “who is himself a legal resident of the Commonwealth and” following “witnessed by a person” in the second sentence and added the last two sentences of the first paragraph.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, §§ 40, 45.

§ 24.2-507.
Deadlines for filing declarations and petitions of candidacy.

For any office, declarations of candidacy and the petitions therefor shall be filed according to the following schedule:

For a general election in November, by 7:00 p.m. on the third Tuesday in June;

For a general election in May, by 7:00 p.m. on the first Tuesday in March;

For a special election held at the same time as a November general election, either (i) at least 81 days before the election or (ii) if the special election is being held at the second November election after the vacancy occurred, by 7:00 p.m. on the third Tuesday in June before that November election;

For a special election held at the same time as a May general election, by 7:00 p.m. on the first Tuesday in March; or

For a special election held at a time other than a general election, (i) at least 60 days before the election or (ii) within five days of any writ of election or order calling a special election to be held less than 60 days after the issuance of the writ or order.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-130, 24-131, 24-134.1, 24-135; 1958, c. 605; 1960, c. 427; 1962, c. 536; 1964, cc. 540, 541; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-166; 1971, Ex. Sess., cc. 119, 247; 1972, c. 620; 1973, c. 30; 1974, c. 428; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 616; 1978, c. 778; 1981, c. 425; 1983, c. 461; 1984, c. 480; 1991, c. 137; 1993, c. 641; 2010, cc. 449, 542, 645; 2011, c. 599; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 239.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 449 and 645 are identical, and in subdivision 5, substituted “45 days” for “thirty days” in clause (i) and substituted “45 days” for “thirty-five days” in clause (ii); and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2010 amendment by c. 542 substituted “81” for “seventy-four” in subdivision 3, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 599 twice substituted “60 days” for “45 days” in subdivision 5.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 239, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “third Tuesday” for “second Tuesday” in subdivisions 1 and 3.